Georgia, session 2025_26, SB351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to establish the State Court of Treutlen (formerly known as the City Court of
Soperton), in and for the County of Treutlen, approved August 18, 1919 (Ga. L. 1919, p.
519), as amended, is amended by adding a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 3.1
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, beginning on July 1, 2025, the judge
shall receive an annual salary of not less than $55,000.08. Beginning on July 1, 2025, the
solicitor-general shall receive an annual salary of not less than $49,000.08. Payments shall
S. B. 351
- 1 -

LC 61 0216
be made in equal monthly installments from the funds of Treutlen County. The judge and
the solicitor-general may succeed themselves in office."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 351
- 2 -